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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI−335

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DTC C0278 / 11,C0279 / 12 ABSSolenoidRelayCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This relay supplies power to each ABS solenoid. After the ignition switch is turned ON, if the initial check is
OK, the relay goes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0278/11

Conditions (1) and (2) continue for 0.2 secs. or more:
(1) ECU terminal IG1 voltage is 9.5 V to 18.5 V and the

solenoid relay is ON, however, the contact point of the
solenoid relay isOFF.

(2) With solenoid relay ON, ECU terminal IG1 voltage
becomes 9.5 V or less and the contact point
of the solenoid relay does not become ON.

SABSsolenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0279/12

Immediately after ECU terminal IG1 becomes ON, and
solenoid relay is OFF, however, when the condition that
the solenoid relay due to the contact point is ON continues
for 0.2 secs. or more.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the ABS solenoid relay circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and
prohibits ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI−336 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
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LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
Start the inspection fromstep incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnotusing
thehand −held tester.

1 CheckABSsolenoidrelayoperation.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theACTIVETESTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check theoperationsoundof theABSsolenoid relaywhenoperating itwith thehand −held tester.
OK:

The operation sound of the ABS solenoid relay should be heard.

OK Go to step 4.

NG

2Checkvoltagebetweenterminals 1 and2ofEngineRoomR/BNo.2 (forABSso-
lenoid relay).

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of Engine
RoomR/BNo.2 (forABSsolenoid relay).
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair harness or connector.

OK
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3 Check ABS solenoid relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid relay.
OK:

Terminals 4 and 6
Continuity

(Reference value 80 �)

Terminals 2 and 3 Continuity

Terminals 1 and 3 Open

CHECK:
(a) Apply battery voltage between terminals 4 and 6.
(b) Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid

relay.
OK:

Terminals 2 and 3 Open

Terminals 1 and 3 Continuity

NG Replace ABS solenoid relay.

OK

4 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS sole-
noid relay and ABS ECU (See page IN−24).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.


